Utah statutes.
70C-1-103.   General principles of law apply -- Treatment of charge or fee.
(1)  Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this title, the Uniform
Commercial Code and the principles of law and equity, including without
limitation the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent,
estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, and bankruptcy
shall supplement its provisions.
(2)  A charge or fee described in Section 70C-1-106 assessed by a depository
institution as defined by Section 7-1-103 in accordance with this title may
not be considered void as a penalty or otherwise unenforceable under statute
or common law.
